Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.570

Compilation, codification, revision of city or town ordinances—Codification satisfies single subject, title, and amendment requirements of statute or charter.

When a city or town shall make a codification of its ordinances in accordance with RCW 35.21.500 through 35.21.570 that shall constitute a sufficient compliance with any statutory or charter requirements that no ordinance shall contain more than one subject which shall be clearly expressed in its title and that no ordinance or any section thereof shall be revised or amended unless the new ordinance sets forth the revised ordinance or amended section in full.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.21.570. Prior: 1957 c 97 s 8.]